Utah statutes.
17-36-13.   Public hearing on budget.
At the specified time and place or at any time and place to which such public
hearing may be adjourned, the governing body shall hold a public hearing on
the budget where all interested persons shall have an opportunity to be heard
for or against the estimates of revenue and expenditures and performance data
or any item in any fund.
